North Carolina, session 2025, SB347.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 3A of Chapter 120 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 120-11.3. In-person voting by use of proxies.
(a) Findings. – The General Assembly of North Carolina finds that advances in
technology have allowed meaningful participation even when persons are not physically
co-located. The General Assembly further finds that these advances allow a legislator to be
present and voting, as contemplated by the Constitution of North Carolina, even if not physically
located in the chamber at the time of the vote.
(b) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Reserved for future codification purposes.
(2) Reserved for future codification purposes.
(3) Designated proxy. – The leader of the party of the qualified member's chamber
appointed to cast a vote for, and in the manner directed by, the qualified
member.
(4) Reserved for future codification purposes.
(5) Reserved for future codification purposes.
(6) Qualified member. – A member of the General Assembly who filed a voting
designation with respect to a triggering event.
(7) Triggering event. – The occurrence of childbirth, adoption, stillbirth, or
miscarriage to a qualified member.
(8) Voting designation. – A written submission by a qualified member to, and on
a form made available by, the Principal Clerk of the member's chamber that
appoints a designated proxy.
(c) Proxy Voting. – The General Assembly shall permit a qualified member not
physically located in the chamber to be present and voting by use of a designated proxy. In order
to vote by use of a designated proxy, (i) the qualified member shall have filed a voting designation
and shall access the real-time, audio or audiovisual stream of each session in which the member
votes by use of a designated proxy, (ii) the designated proxy shall be physically located in the
chamber when the question is put, and (iii) over one-half of the members of the chamber shall
have already voted in the chamber on the question. After the members in the chamber have voted,
*S347-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the presiding officer shall call on the designated proxy of each qualified member voting pursuant
to this subsection.
(d) Security; Means. – The General Assembly of North Carolina shall, in accordance with
rules adopted by each of the respective bodies, establish a process by which to validate and secure
proxy voting conducted pursuant to subsection (c) of this section. Notwithstanding any rules
adopted by a chamber to the contrary, the use of electronic devices, as necessary to effectuate the
validation required by this subsection, shall be allowed in the chambers.
(e) Duration. – A qualified member's voting designation shall be valid until the earlier of
(i) 16 weeks from a triggering event or (ii) the date the qualified member revokes the designation
in writing on a form made available by, and filed with, the appropriate Principal Clerk."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 Senate Bill 347-First Edition